Oklahoma, session 2025, SB533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 2-121, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 81, O.S.L. 2022 (37A O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2-121), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2-121. A. An employee license shall authorize the


holder thereof to work in a licensed package store, retail spirits,


retail wine or retail beer establishment, brewpub, mixed beverage


establishment, beer and wine establishment, bottle club, public


event or any establishment where alcohol or alcoholic beverages are


sold, mixed or served. Persons employed by a mixed beverage, on-


premises beer and wine, retail wine, retail beer, public event or a


bottle club licensee who do not participate in the service, mixing


or sale of mixed beverages shall not be required to have an employee

Req. No. 200 Page 1


license. Provided, however, that a manager employed by a mixed


beverage licensee, public event licensee or a bottle club shall be


required to have an employee license whether or not the manager


participates in the service, mixing or sale of mixed beverages.


Applicants for an employee license shall be at least eighteen (18)


years of age, except for applicants employed by a grocery store or


convenience store who shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age,


and have a health card issued by the county in which they are


employed, if the county issues such a card; provided, the provisions


of this section shall not be construed to permit any person under


twenty-one (21) years of age to be employed to sell spirits.


Employees of a special event, caterer, unless catering a mixed


beverage-licensed premises, or airline/railroad beverage licensees


shall not be required to obtain an employee license; further,


employees of beer distributors and other licensees holding licenses


issued by the ABLE Commission shall not be required to obtain an


employee license if such employee only sells alcohol or alcoholic


beverages to establishments holding licenses issued by the ABLE


Commission and not to the public. Persons employed by a hotel


licensee who participate in the stocking of hotel room mini-bars or


in the handling of alcoholic beverages to be placed in such devices


shall be required to have an employee license. As a prerequisite to


the issuance of an employee license, not later than fourteen (14)


days after initial licensure, the first-time applicant shall be

Req. No. 200 Page 2


required to have successfully completed a training program conducted


by the ABLE Commission, or by another entity approved by the ABLE


Commission including an in-house training program conducted by the


employer. Proof of training completion shall be made available for


inspection by the ABLE Commission at the business location employing


the licensee. The failure of an employee licensee to comply with


this section may constitute a revocable offense.


B. An individual whose name appears on the business entity’s


license shall not be required to obtain an employee license to work


on the premises of the business.


C. In the event the ABLE Commission denies an application for


an employee license, the Commission shall provide written notice to


the applicant’s employer, if any. The notice shall be given at the


time notice is provided to the applicant.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-200 CAD 1/19/2025 5:38:11 AM















Req. No. 200 Page 3